Nebraska, session 109, LB82.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB82 LB82
2025 2025
Section 1. COSMETOLOGY LICENSURE COMPACT
ARTICLE 1- PURPOSE
The purpose of this Compact is to facilitate the interstate practice
and regulation of Cosmetology with the goal of improving public access
to, and the safety of, Cosmetology Services and reducing unnecessary
burdens related to Cosmetology licensure. Through this Compact, the
Member States seek to establish a regulatory framework which provides for
a new multistate licensing program. Through this new licensing program,
the Member States seek to provide increased value and mobility to
licensed Cosmetologists in the Member States, while ensuring the
provision of safe, effective, and reliable services to the public.
This Compact is designed to achieve the following objectives, and
the Member States hereby ratify the same intentions by subscribing
hereto:
A. Provide opportunities for interstate practice by Cosmetologists
who meet uniform requirements for multistate licensure;
B. Enhance the abilities of Member States to protect public health
and safety, and prevent fraud and unlicensed activity within the
profession;
C. Ensure and encourage cooperation between Member States in the
licensure and regulation of the Practice of Cosmetology;
D. Support relocating military members and their spouses;
E. Facilitate the exchange of information between Member States
related to the licensure, investigation, and discipline of the Practice
of Cosmetology;
F. Provide for the licensure and mobility of the workforce in the
profession, while addressing the shortage of workers and lessening the
associated burdens on the Member States.
ARTICLE 2- DEFINITIONS
As used in this Compact, and except as otherwise provided, the
following definitions shall govern the terms herein:
-2-

LB82 LB82
2025 2025
A. "Active Duty Military" means any individual in full-time duty
status in the active uniformed service of the United States including
members of the National Guard and Reserve.
B. "Adverse Action" means any administrative, civil, equitable, or
criminal action permitted by a Member State's laws which is imposed by a
State Licensing Authority or other regulatory body against a
Cosmetologist, including actions against an individual's license or
Authorization to Practice such as revocation, suspension, probation,
monitoring of the Licensee, limitation of the Licensee's practice, or any
other Encumbrance on a license affecting an individual's ability to
participate in the Cosmetology industry, including the issuance of a
cease and desist order.
C. "Authorization to Practice" means a legal authorization
associated with a Multistate License permitting the Practice of
Cosmetology in a Remote State, which shall be subject to the enforcement
jurisdiction of the State Licensing Authority in that Remote State.
D. "Alternative Program" means a non-disciplinary monitoring or
prosecutorial diversion program approved by a Member State's State
Licensing Authority.
E. "Background Check" means the submission of information for an
applicant for the purpose of obtaining that applicant's criminal history
record information, as further defined in 28 C.F.R. § 20.3(d), from the
Federal Bureau of Investigation and the agency responsible for retaining
State criminal or disciplinary history in the applicant's Home State.
F. "Charter Member State" means Member States who have enacted
legislation to adopt this Compact where such legislation predates the
effective date of this Compact as defined in Article 13.
G. "Commission" means the government agency whose membership
consists of all States that have enacted this Compact, which is known as
the Cosmetology Licensure Compact Commission, as defined in Article 9,
and which shall operate as an instrumentality of the Member States.
-3-

LB82 LB82
2025 2025
H. "Cosmetologist" means an individual licensed in their Home State
to practice Cosmetology.
I. "Cosmetology", "Cosmetology Services", and the "Practice of
Cosmetology" mean the care and services provided by a Cosmetologist as
set forth in the Member State's statutes and regulations in the State
where the services are being provided.
J. "Current Significant Investigative Information" means:
1. Investigative Information that a State Licensing Authority, after
an inquiry or investigation that complies with a Member State's due
process requirements, has reason to believe is not groundless and, if
proved true, would indicate a violation of that State's laws regarding
fraud or the Practice of Cosmetology; or
2. Investigative Information that indicates that a Licensee has
engaged in fraud or represents an immediate threat to public health and
safety, regardless of whether the Licensee has been notified and had an
opportunity to respond.
K. "Data System" means a repository of information about Licensees,
including, but not limited to, license status, Investigative Information,
and Adverse Actions.
L. "Disqualifying Event" means any event which shall disqualify an
individual from holding a Multistate License under this Compact, which
the Commission may by Rule or order specify.
M. "Encumbered License" means a license in which an Adverse Action
restricts the Practice of Cosmetology by a Licensee, or where said
Adverse Action has been reported to the Commission.
N. "Encumbrance" means a revocation or suspension of, or any
limitation on, the full and unrestricted Practice of Cosmetology by a
State Licensing Authority.
O. "Executive Committee" means a group of delegates elected or
appointed to act on behalf of, and within the powers granted to them by,
the Commission.
-4-

LB82 LB82
2025 2025
P. "Home State" means the Member State which is a Licensee's primary
State of residence, and where that Licensee holds an active and
unencumbered license to practice Cosmetology.
Q. "Investigative Information" means information, records, or
documents received or generated by a State Licensing Authority pursuant
to an investigation or other inquiry.
R. "Jurisprudence Requirement" means the assessment of an
individual's knowledge of the laws and rules governing the Practice of
Cosmetology in a State.
S. "Licensee" means an individual who currently holds a license from
a Member State to practice as a Cosmetologist.
T. "Member State" means any State that has adopted this Compact.
U. "Multistate License" means a license issued by and subject to the
enforcement jurisdiction of the State Licensing Authority in a Licensee's
Home State, which authorizes the Practice of Cosmetology in Member States
and includes Authorizations to Practice Cosmetology in all Remote States
pursuant to this Compact.
V. "Remote State" means any Member State, other than the Licensee's
Home State.
W. "Rule" means any rule or regulation promulgated by the Commission
under this Compact which has the force of law.
X. "Single-State License" means a Cosmetology license issued by a
Member State that authorizes practice of Cosmetology only within the
issuing State and does not include any authorization outside of the
issuing State.
Y. "State" means a State, territory, or possession of the United
States and the District of Columbia.
Z. "State Licensing Authority" means a Member State's regulatory
body responsible for issuing Cosmetology licenses or otherwise overseeing
the Practice of Cosmetology in that State.
ARTICLE 3- MEMBER STATE REQUIREMENTS
-5-

LB82 LB82
2025 2025
A. To be eligible to join this Compact, and to maintain eligibility
as a Member State, a State must:
1. License and regulate Cosmetology;
2. Have a mechanism or entity in place to receive and investigate
complaints about Licensees practicing in that State;
3. Require that Licensees within the State pass a Cosmetology
competency examination prior to being licensed to provide Cosmetology
Services to the public in that State;
4. Require that Licensees satisfy educational or training
requirements in Cosmetology prior to being licensed to provide
Cosmetology Services to the public in that State;
5. Implement procedures for considering one or more of the following
categories of information from applicants for licensure: criminal
history; disciplinary history; or Background Check. Such procedures may
include the submission of information by applicants for the purpose of
obtaining an applicant's Background Check as defined herein;
6. Participate in the Data System, including through the use of
unique identifying numbers;
7. Share information related to Adverse Actions with the Commission
and other Member States, both through the Data System and otherwise;
8. Notify the Commission and other Member States, in compliance with
the terms of the Compact and Rules of the Commission, of the existence of
Investigative Information or Current Significant Investigative
Information in the State's possession regarding a Licensee practicing in
that State;
9. Comply with such Rules as may be enacted by the Commission to
administer the Compact; and
10. Accept Licensees from other Member States as established herein.
B. Member States may charge a fee for granting a license to practice
Cosmetology.
C. Individuals not residing in a Member State shall continue to be
-6-

LB82 LB82
2025 2025
able to apply for a Member State's Single-State License as provided under
the laws of each Member State. However, the Single-State License granted
to these individuals shall not be recognized as granting a Multistate
License to provide services in any other Member State.
D. Nothing in this Compact shall affect the requirements established
by a Member State for the issuance of a Single-State License.
E. A Multistate License issued to a Licensee by a Home State to a
resident of that State shall be recognized by each Member State as
authorizing a Licensee to practice Cosmetology in each Member State.
F. At no point shall the Commission have the power to define the
educational or professional requirements for a license to practice
Cosmetology. The Member States shall retain sole jurisdiction over the
provision of these requirements.
ARTICLE 4- MULTISTATE LICENSE
A. To be eligible to apply to their Home State's State Licensing
Authority for an initial Multistate License under this Compact, a
Licensee must hold an active and unencumbered Single-State License to
practice Cosmetology in their Home State.
B. Upon the receipt of an application for a Multistate License,
according to the Rules of the Commission, a Member State's State
Licensing Authority shall ascertain whether the applicant meets the
requirements for a Multistate License under this Compact.
C. If an applicant meets the requirements for a Multistate License
under this Compact and any applicable Rules of the Commission, the State
Licensing Authority in receipt of the application shall, within a
reasonable time, grant a Multistate License to that applicant, and inform
all Member States of the grant of said Multistate License.
D. A Multistate License to practice Cosmetology issued by a Member
State's State Licensing Authority shall be recognized by each Member
State as authorizing the practice thereof as though that Licensee held a
Single-State License to do so in each Member State, subject to the
-7-

LB82 LB82
2025 2025
restrictions herein.
E. A Multistate License granted pursuant to this Compact may be
effective for a definite period of time, concurrent with the licensure
renewal period in the Home State.
F. To maintain a Multistate License under this Compact, a Licensee
must:
1. Agree to abide by the rules of the State Licensing Authority, and
the State scope of practice laws governing the Practice of Cosmetology,
of any Member State in which the Licensee provides services;
2. Pay all required fees related to the application and process, and
any other fees which the Commission may by Rule require; and
3. Comply with any and all other requirements regarding Multistate
Licenses which the Commission may by Rule provide.
G. A Licensee practicing in a Member State is subject to all scope
of practice laws governing Cosmetology Services in that State.
H. The Practice of Cosmetology under a Multistate License granted
pursuant to this Compact will subject the Licensee to the jurisdiction of
the State Licensing Authority, the courts, and the laws of the Member
State in which the Cosmetology Services are provided.
ARTICLE 5- REISSUANCE OF A MULTISTATE LICENSE BY A NEW HOME STATE
A. A Licensee may hold a Multistate License, issued by their Home
State, in only one Member State at any given time.
B. If a Licensee changes their Home State by moving between two
Member States:
1. The Licensee shall immediately apply for the reissuance of their
Multistate License in their new Home State. The Licensee shall pay all
applicable fees and notify the prior Home State in accordance with the
Rules of the Commission.
2. Upon receipt of an application to reissue a Multistate License,
the new Home State shall verify that the Multistate License is active,
unencumbered and eligible for reissuance under the terms of the Compact
-8-

LB82 LB82
2025 2025
and the Rules of the Commission. The Multistate License issued by the
prior Home State will be deactivated and all Member States notified in
accordance with the applicable Rules adopted by the Commission.
3. If required for initial licensure, the new Home State may require
a Background Check as specified in the laws of that State, or the
compliance with any Jurisprudence Requirements of the new Home State.
4. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Compact, if a
Licensee does not meet the requirements set forth in this Compact for the
reissuance of a Multistate License by the new Home State, then the
Licensee shall be subject to the new Home State requirements for the
issuance of a Single-State License in that State.
C. If a Licensee changes their primary state of residence by moving
from a Member State to a non-Member State, or from a non-Member State to
a Member State, then the Licensee shall be subject to the State
requirements for the issuance of a Single-State License in the new Home
State.
D. Nothing in this Compact shall interfere with a Licensee's ability
to hold a Single-State License in multiple States; however, for the
purposes of this Compact, a Licensee shall have only one Home State, and
only one Multistate License.
E. Nothing in this Compact shall interfere with the requirements
established by a Member State for the issuance of a Single-State License.
ARTICLE 6- AUTHORITY OF THE COMPACT COMMISSION AND MEMBER STATE
LICENSING AUTHORITIES
A. Nothing in this Compact, nor any Rule or regulation of the
Commission, shall be construed to limit, restrict, or in any way reduce
the ability of a Member State to enact and enforce laws, regulations, or
other rules related to the Practice of Cosmetology in that State, where
those laws, regulations, or other rules are not inconsistent with the
provisions of this Compact.
B. Insofar as practical, a Member State's State Licensing Authority
-9-

LB82 LB82
2025 2025
shall cooperate with the Commission and with each entity exercising
independent regulatory authority over the Practice of Cosmetology
according to the provisions of this Compact.
C. Discipline shall be the sole responsibility of the State in which
Cosmetology Services are provided. Accordingly, each Member State's State
Licensing Authority shall be responsible for receiving complaints about
individuals practicing Cosmetology in that State, and for communicating
all relevant Investigative Information about any such Adverse Action to
the other Member States through the Data System in addition to any other
methods the Commission may by Rule require.
ARTICLE 7- ADVERSE ACTIONS
A. A Licensee's Home State shall have exclusive power to impose an
Adverse Action against a Licensee's Multistate License issued by the Home
State.
B. A Home State may take Adverse Action on a Multistate License
based on the Investigative Information, Current Significant Investigative
Information, or Adverse Action of a Remote State.
C. In addition to the powers conferred by State law, each Remote
State's State Licensing Authority shall have the power to:
1. Take Adverse Action against a Licensee's Authorization to
Practice Cosmetology through the Multistate License in that Member State,
provided that:
a. Only the Licensee's Home State shall have the power to take
Adverse Action against the Multistate License issued by the Home State;
and
b. For the purposes of taking Adverse Action, the Home State's State
Licensing Authority shall give the same priority and effect to reported
conduct received from a Remote State as it would if such conduct had
occurred within the Home State. In so doing, the Home State shall apply
its own State laws to determine the appropriate action.
2. Issue cease and desist orders or impose an Encumbrance on a
-10-

LB82 LB82
2025 2025
Licensee's Authorization to Practice within that Member State.
3. Complete any pending investigations of a Licensee who changes
their primary state of residence during the course of such an
investigation. The State Licensing Authority shall also be empowered to
report the results of such an investigation to the Commission through the
Data System as described herein.
4. Issue subpoenas for both hearings and investigations that require
the attendance and testimony of witnesses, as well as the production of
evidence. Subpoenas issued by a State Licensing Authority in a Member
State for the attendance and testimony of witnesses or the production of
evidence from another Member State shall be enforced in the latter State
by any court of competent jurisdiction, according to the practice and
procedure of that court applicable to subpoenas issued in proceedings
before it. The issuing State Licensing Authority shall pay any witness
fees, travel expenses, mileage, and other fees required by the service
statutes of the State in which the witnesses or evidence are located.
5. If otherwise permitted by State law, recover from the affected
Licensee the costs of investigations and disposition of cases resulting
from any Adverse Action taken against that Licensee.
6. Take Adverse Action against the Licensee's Authorization to
Practice in that State based on the factual findings of another Remote
State.
D. A Licensee's Home State shall complete any pending
investigation(s) of a Cosmetologist who changes their primary state of
residence during the course of the investigation(s). The Home State shall
also have the authority to take appropriate action(s) and shall promptly
report the conclusions of the investigations to the Data System.
E. If an Adverse Action is taken by the Home State against a
Licensee's Multistate License, the Licensee's Authorization to Practice
in all other Member States shall be deactivated until all Encumbrances
have been removed from the Home State license. All Home State
-11-

LB82 LB82
2025 2025
disciplinary orders that impose an Adverse Action against a Licensee's
Multistate License shall include a statement that the Cosmetologist's
Authorization to Practice is deactivated in all Member States during the
pendency of the order.
F. Nothing in this Compact shall override a Member State's authority
to accept a Licensee's participation in an Alternative Program in lieu of
Adverse Action. A Licensee's Multistate License shall be suspended for
the duration of the Licensee's participation in any Alternative Program.
G. Joint Investigations
1. In addition to the authority granted to a Member State by its
respective scope of practice laws or other applicable State law, a Member
State may participate with other Member States in joint investigations of
Licensees.
2. Member States shall share any investigative, litigation, or
compliance materials in furtherance of any joint or individual
investigation initiated under the Compact.
ARTICLE 8- ACTIVE DUTY MILITARY AND THEIR SPOUSES
Active Duty Military personnel, or their spouses, shall designate a
Home State where the individual has a current license to practice
Cosmetology in good standing. The individual may retain their Home State
designation during any period of service when that individual or their
spouse is on active duty assignment.
ARTICLE 9- ESTABLISHMENT AND OPERATION OF THE COSMETOLOGY LICENSURE
COMPACT COMMISSION
A. The Compact Member States hereby create and establish a joint
government agency whose membership consists of all Member States that
have enacted the Compact known as the Cosmetology Licensure Compact
Commission. The Commission is an instrumentality of the Compact Member
States acting jointly and not an instrumentality of any one State. The
Commission shall come into existence on or after the effective date of
the Compact as set forth in Article 13.
-12-

LB82 LB82
2025 2025
B. Membership, Voting, and Meetings
1. Each Member State shall have and be limited to one (1) delegate
selected by that Member State's State Licensing Authority.
2. The delegate shall be an administrator of the State Licensing
Authority of the Member State or their designee.
3. The Commission shall by Rule or bylaw establish a term of office
for delegates and may by Rule or bylaw establish term limits.
4. The Commission may recommend removal or suspension of any
delegate from office.
5. A Member State's State Licensing Authority shall fill any vacancy
of its delegate occurring on the Commission within 60 days of the
vacancy.
6. Each delegate shall be entitled to one vote on all matters that
are voted on by the Commission.
7. The Commission shall meet at least once during each calendar
year. Additional meetings may be held as set forth in the bylaws. The
Commission may meet by telecommunication, video conference, or other
similar electronic means.
C. The Commission shall have the following powers:
1. Establish the fiscal year of the Commission;
2. Establish code of conduct and conflict of interest policies;
3. Adopt Rules and bylaws;
4. Maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws;
5. Meet and take such actions as are consistent with the provisions
of this Compact, the Commission's Rules, and the bylaws;
6. Initiate and conclude legal proceedings or actions in the name of
the Commission, provided that the standing of any State Licensing
Authority to sue or be sued under applicable law shall not be affected;
7. Maintain and certify records and information provided to a Member
State as the authenticated business records of the Commission, and
designate an agent to do so on the Commission's behalf;
-13-

LB82 LB82
2025 2025
8. Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
9. Borrow, accept, or contract for services of personnel, including,
but not limited to, employees of a Member State;
10. Conduct an annual financial review;
11. Hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix compensation,
define duties, grant such individuals appropriate authority to carry out
the purposes of the Compact, and establish the Commission's personnel
policies and programs relating to conflicts of interest, qualifications
of personnel, and other related personnel matters;
12. As set forth in the Commission Rules, charge a fee to a Licensee
for the grant of a Multistate License and thereafter, as may be
established by Commission Rule, charge the Licensee a Multistate License
renewal fee for each renewal period. Nothing herein shall be construed to
prevent a Home State from charging a Licensee a fee for a Multistate
License or renewals of a Multistate License, or a fee for the
jurisprudence requirement if the Member State imposes such a requirement
for the grant of a Multistate License;
13. Assess and collect fees;
14. Accept any and all appropriate gifts, donations, grants of
money, other sources of revenue, equipment, supplies, materials, and
services, and receive, utilize, and dispose of the same; provided that at
all times the Commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety or
conflict of interest;
15. Lease, purchase, retain, own, hold, improve, or use any
property, real, personal, or mixed, or any undivided interest therein;
16. Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or
otherwise dispose of any property real, personal, or mixed;
17. Establish a budget and make expenditures;
18. Borrow money;
19. Appoint committees, including standing committees, composed of
members, State regulators, State legislators or their representatives,
-14-

LB82 LB82
2025 2025
and consumer representatives, and such other interested persons as may be
designated in this Compact and the bylaws;
20. Provide and receive information from, and cooperate with, law
enforcement agencies;
21. Elect a Chair, Vice Chair, Secretary and Treasurer and such
other officers of the Commission as provided in the Commission's bylaws;
22. Establish and elect an Executive Committee, including a chair
and a vice chair;
23. Adopt and provide to the Member States an annual report;
24. Determine whether a State's adopted language is materially
different from the model Compact language such that the State would not
qualify for participation in the Compact; and
25. Perform such other functions as may be necessary or appropriate
to achieve the purposes of this Compact.
D. The Executive Committee
1. The Executive Committee shall have the power to act on behalf of
the Commission according to the terms of this Compact. The powers,
duties, and responsibilities of the Executive Committee shall include:
a. Overseeing the day-to-day activities of the administration of the
Compact including compliance with the provisions of the Compact, the
Commission's Rules and bylaws, and other such duties as deemed necessary;
b. Recommending to the Commission changes to the Rules or bylaws,
changes to this Compact legislation, fees charged to Compact Member
States, fees charged to Licensees, and other fees;
c. Ensuring Compact administration services are appropriately
provided, including by contract;
d. Preparing and recommending the budget;
e. Maintaining financial records on behalf of the Commission;
f. Monitoring Compact compliance of Member States and providing
compliance reports to the Commission;
g. Establishing additional committees as necessary;
-15-

LB82 LB82
2025 2025
h. Exercising the powers and duties of the Commission during the
interim between Commission meetings, except for adopting or amending
Rules, adopting or amending bylaws, and exercising any other powers and
duties expressly reserved to the Commission by Rule or bylaw; and
i. Other duties as provided in the Rules or bylaws of the
Commission.
2. The Executive Committee shall be composed of up to seven voting
members:
a. The chair and vice chair of the Commission and any other members
of the Commission who serve on the Executive Committee shall be voting
members of the Executive Committee; and
b. Other than the chair and vice chair, secretary, and treasurer,
the Commission shall elect three voting members from the current
membership of the Commission.
c. The Commission may elect ex-officio, nonvoting members from a
recognized national Cosmetology professional association as approved by
the Commission. The Commission's bylaws shall identify qualifying
organizations and the manner of appointment if the number of
organizations seeking to appoint an ex officio member exceeds the number
of members specified in this Article.
3. The Commission may remove any member of the Executive Committee
as provided in the Commission's bylaws.
4. The Executive Committee shall meet at least annually.
a. Annual Executive Committee meetings, as well as any Executive
Committee meeting at which it does not take or intend to take formal
action on a matter for which a Commission vote would otherwise be
required, shall be open to the public, except that the Executive
Committee may meet in a closed, non-public session of a public meeting
when dealing with any of the matters covered under Article 9.F.4.
b. The Executive Committee shall give five business days advance
notice of its public meetings, posted on its website and as determined to
-16-

LB82 LB82
2025 2025
provide notice to persons with an interest in the public matters the
Executive Committee intends to address at those meetings.
5. The Executive Committee may hold an emergency meeting when acting
for the Commission to:
a. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare;
b. Prevent a loss of Commission or Member State funds; or
c. Protect public health and safety.
E. The Commission shall adopt and provide to the Member States an
annual report.
F. Meetings of the Commission
1. All meetings of the Commission that are not closed pursuant to
Article 9.F.4 shall be open to the public. Notice of public meetings
shall be posted on the Commission's website at least thirty (30) days
prior to the public meeting.
2. Notwithstanding Article 9.F.1, the Commission may convene an
emergency public meeting by providing at least twenty-four (24) hours
prior notice on the Commission's website, and any other means as provided
in the Commission's Rules, for any of the reasons it may dispense with
notice of proposed rulemaking under Article 11.L. The Commission's legal
counsel shall certify that one of the reasons justifying an emergency
public meeting has been met.
3. Notice of all Commission meetings shall provide the time, date,
and location of the meeting, and if the meeting is to be held or
accessible via telecommunication, video conference, or other electronic
means, the notice shall include the mechanism for access to the meeting.
4. The Commission may convene in a closed, non-public meeting for
the Commission to discuss:
a. Non-compliance of a Member State with its obligations under the
Compact;
b. The employment, compensation, discipline or other matters,
practices or procedures related to specific employees or other matters
-17-

LB82 LB82
2025 2025
related to the Commission's internal personnel practices and procedures;
c. Current or threatened discipline of a Licensee by the Commission
or by a Member State's Licensing Authority;
d. Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated litigation;
e. Negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease, or sale of
goods, services, or real estate;
f. Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring any person;
g. Trade secrets or commercial or financial information that is
privileged or confidential;
h. Information of a personal nature where disclosure would
constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;
i. Investigative records compiled for law enforcement purposes;
j. Information related to any investigative reports prepared by, on
behalf of, or for use of the Commission or other committee charged with
responsibility of investigation or determination of compliance issues
pursuant to the Compact;
k. Legal Advice;
l. Matters specifically exempted from disclosure to the public by
federal or Member State law; or
m. Other matters as promulgated by the Commission by Rule.
5. If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed, the presiding
officer shall state that the meeting will be closed and reference each
relevant exempting provision, and such reference shall be recorded in the
minutes.
6. The Commission shall keep minutes that fully and clearly describe
all matters discussed in a meeting and shall provide a full and accurate
summary of actions taken, and the reasons therefore, including a
description of the views expressed. All documents considered in
connection with an action shall be identified in such minutes. All
minutes and documents of a closed meeting shall remain under seal,
subject to release only by a majority vote of the Commission or order of
-18-

LB82 LB82
2025 2025
a court of competent jurisdiction.
G. Financing of the Commission
1. The Commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the
reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization, and ongoing
activities.
2. The Commission may accept any and all appropriate sources of
revenue, donations, and grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials,
and services.
3. The Commission may levy on and collect an annual assessment from
each Member State and impose fees on Licensees of Member States to whom
it grants a Multistate License to cover the cost of the operations and
activities of the Commission and its staff, which must be in a total
amount sufficient to cover its annual budget as approved each year for
which revenue is not provided by other sources. The aggregate annual
assessment amount for Member States shall be allocated based upon a
formula that the Commission shall promulgate by Rule.
4. The Commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior to
securing the funds adequate to meet the same; nor shall the Commission
pledge the credit of any Member States, except by and with the authority
of the Member State.
5. The Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and
disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the Commission shall be
subject to the financial review and accounting procedures established
under its bylaws. All receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the
Commission shall be subject to an annual financial review by a certified
or licensed public accountant, and the report of the financial review
shall be included in and become part of the annual report of the
Commission.
H. Qualified Immunity, Defense, and Indemnification
1. The members, officers, executive director, employees, and
representatives of the Commission shall be immune from suit and
-19-

LB82 LB82
2025 2025
liability, both personally and in their official capacity, for any claim
for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other civil
liability caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged act, error,
or omission that occurred, or that the person against whom the claim is
made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of
Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities; provided that nothing
in this paragraph shall be construed to protect any such person from suit
or liability for any damage, loss, injury, or liability caused by the
intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that person. The
procurement of insurance of any type by the Commission shall not in any
way compromise or limit the immunity granted hereunder.
2. The Commission shall defend any member, officer, executive
director, employee, and representative of the Commission in any civil
action seeking to impose liability arising out of any actual or alleged
act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope of Commission
employment, duties, or responsibilities, or as determined by the
Commission that the person against whom the claim is made had a
reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of Commission
employment, duties, or responsibilities; provided that nothing herein
shall be construed to prohibit that person from retaining their own
counsel at their own expense; and provided further, that the actual or
alleged act, error, or omission did not result from that person's
intentional or willful or wanton misconduct.
3. The Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any member,
officer, executive director, employee, and representative of the
Commission for the amount of any settlement or judgment obtained against
that person arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission
that occurred within the scope of Commission employment, duties, or
responsibilities, or that such person had a reasonable basis for
believing occurred within the scope of Commission employment, duties, or
responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act, error, or
-20-

LB82 LB82
2025 2025
omission did not result from the intentional or willful or wanton
misconduct of that person.
4. Nothing herein shall be construed as a limitation on the
liability of any Licensee for professional malpractice or misconduct,
which shall be governed solely by any other applicable State laws.
5. Nothing in this Compact shall be interpreted to waive or
otherwise abrogate a Member State's State action immunity or State action
affirmative defense with respect to antitrust claims under the Sherman
Act, Clayton Act, or any other State or federal antitrust or
anticompetitive law or regulation.
6. Nothing in this Compact shall be construed to be a waiver of
sovereign immunity by the Member States or by the Commission.
ARTICLE 10- DATA SYSTEM
A. The Commission shall provide for the development, maintenance,
operation, and utilization of a coordinated database and reporting
system.
B. The Commission shall assign each applicant for a Multistate
License a unique identifier, as determined by the Rules of the
Commission.
C. Notwithstanding any other provision of State law to the contrary,
a Member State shall submit a uniform data set to the Data System on all
individuals to whom this Compact is applicable as required by the Rules
of the Commission, including:
1. Identifying information;
2. Licensure data;
3. Adverse Actions against a license and information related
thereto;
4. Non-confidential information related to Alternative Program
participation, the beginning and ending dates of such participation, and
other information related to such participation;
5. Any denial of application for licensure, and the reason(s) for
-21-

LB82 LB82
2025 2025
such denial (excluding the reporting of any criminal history record
information where prohibited by law);
6. The existence of Investigative Information;
7. The existence of Current Significant Investigative Information;
and
8. Other information that may facilitate the administration of this
Compact or the protection of the public, as determined by the Rules of
the Commission.
D. The records and information provided to a Member State pursuant
to this Compact or through the Data System, when certified by the
Commission or an agent thereof, shall constitute the authenticated
business records of the Commission, and shall be entitled to any
associated hearsay exception in any relevant judicial, quasi-judicial, or
administrative proceedings in a Member State.
E. The existence of Current Significant Investigative Information
and the existence of Investigative Information pertaining to a Licensee
in any Member State will only be available to other Member States.
F. It is the responsibility of the Member States to monitor the
database to determine whether Adverse Action has been taken against a
Licensee or License applicant. Adverse Action information pertaining to a
Licensee or License applicant in any Member State will be available to
any other Member State.
G. Member States contributing information to the Data System may
designate information that may not be shared with the public without the
express permission of the contributing State.
H. Any information submitted to the Data System that is subsequently
expunged pursuant to federal law or the laws of the Member State
contributing the information shall be removed from the Data System.
ARTICLE 11- RULEMAKING
A. The Commission shall promulgate reasonable Rules in order to
effectively and efficiently implement and administer the purposes and
-22-

LB82 LB82
2025 2025
provisions of the Compact. A Rule shall be invalid and have no force or
effect only if a court of competent jurisdiction holds that the Rule is
invalid because the Commission exercised its rulemaking authority in a
manner that is beyond the scope and purposes of the Compact, or the
powers granted hereunder, or based upon another applicable standard of
review.
B. The Rules of the Commission shall have the force of law in each
Member State, provided however that where the Rules of the Commission
conflict with the laws of the Member State that establish the Member
State's scope of practice laws governing the Practice of Cosmetology as
held by a court of competent jurisdiction, the Rules of the Commission
shall be ineffective in that State to the extent of the conflict.
C. The Commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers pursuant to
the criteria set forth in this Article and the Rules adopted thereunder.
Rules shall become binding as of the date specified by the Commission for
each Rule.
D. If a majority of the legislatures of the Member States rejects a
Rule or portion of a Rule, by enactment of a statute or resolution in the
same manner used to adopt the Compact within four (4) years of the date
of adoption of the Rule, then such Rule shall have no further force and
effect in any Member State or to any State applying to participate in the
Compact.
E. Rules shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of the
Commission.
F. Prior to adoption of a proposed Rule, the Commission shall hold a
public hearing and allow persons to provide oral and written comments,
data, facts, opinions, and arguments.
G. Prior to adoption of a proposed Rule by the Commission, and at
least thirty (30) days in advance of the meeting at which the Commission
will hold a public hearing on the proposed Rule, the Commission shall
provide a notice of proposed rulemaking:
-23-

LB82 LB82
2025 2025
1. On the website of the Commission or other publicly accessible
platform;
2. To persons who have requested notice of the Commission's notices
of proposed rulemaking; and
3. In such other way(s) as the Commission may by Rule specify.
H. The notice of proposed rulemaking shall include:
1. The time, date, and location of the public hearing at which the
Commission will hear public comments on the proposed Rule and, if
different, the time, date, and location of the meeting where the
Commission will consider and vote on the proposed Rule;
2. If the hearing is held via telecommunication, video conference,
or other electronic means, the Commission shall include the mechanism for
access to the hearing in the notice of proposed rulemaking;
3. The text of the proposed Rule and the reason therefor;
4. A request for comments on the proposed Rule from any interested
person; and
5. The manner in which interested persons may submit written
comments.
I. All hearings will be recorded. A copy of the recording and all
written comments and documents received by the Commission in response to
the proposed Rule shall be available to the public.
J. Nothing in this Article shall be construed as requiring a
separate hearing on each Rule. Rules may be grouped for the convenience
of the Commission at hearings required by this Article.
K. The Commission shall, by majority vote of all members, take final
action on the proposed Rule based on the rulemaking record and the full
text of the Rule.
1. The Commission may adopt changes to the proposed Rule provided
the changes do not enlarge the original purpose of the proposed Rule.
2. The Commission shall provide an explanation of the reasons for
substantive changes made to the proposed Rule as well as reasons for
-24-

LB82 LB82
2025 2025
substantive changes not made that were recommended by commenters.
3. The Commission shall determine a reasonable effective date for
the Rule. Except for an emergency as provided in Article 11.L, the
effective date of the Rule shall be no sooner than forty-five (45) days
after the Commission issuing the notice that it adopted or amended the
Rule.
L. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the Commission may
consider and adopt an emergency Rule with five (5) days' notice, with
opportunity to comment, provided that the usual rulemaking procedures
provided in the Compact and in this Article shall be retroactively
applied to the Rule as soon as reasonably possible, in no event later
than ninety (90) days after the effective date of the Rule. For the
purposes of this provision, an emergency Rule is one that must be adopted
immediately to:
1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare;
2. Prevent a loss of Commission or Member State funds;
3. Meet a deadline for the promulgation of a Rule that is
established by federal law or rule; or
4. Protect public health and safety.
M. The Commission or an authorized committee of the Commission may
direct revisions to a previously adopted Rule for purposes of correcting
typographical errors, errors in format, errors in consistency, or
grammatical errors. Public notice of any revisions shall be posted on the
website of the Commission. The revision shall be subject to challenge by
any person for a period of thirty (30) days after posting. The revision
may be challenged only on grounds that the revision results in a material
change to a Rule. A challenge shall be made in writing and delivered to
the Commission prior to the end of the notice period. If no challenge is
made, the revision will take effect without further action. If the
revision is challenged, the revision may not take effect without the
approval of the Commission.
-25-

LB82 LB82
2025 2025
N. No Member State's rulemaking requirements shall apply under this
Compact.
ARTICLE 12- OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, AND ENFORCEMENT
A. Oversight
1. The executive and judicial branches of State government in each
Member State shall enforce this Compact and take all actions necessary
and appropriate to implement the Compact.
2. Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against the
Commission shall be brought solely and exclusively in a court of
competent jurisdiction where the principal office of the Commission is
located. The Commission may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to
the extent it adopts or consents to participate in alternative dispute
resolution proceedings. Nothing herein shall affect or limit the
selection or propriety of venue in any action against a Licensee for
professional malpractice, misconduct, or any such similar matter.
3. The Commission shall be entitled to receive service of process in
any proceeding regarding the enforcement or interpretation of the Compact
and shall have standing to intervene in such a proceeding for all
purposes. Failure to provide the Commission service of process shall
render a judgment or order void as to the Commission, this Compact, or
promulgated Rules.
B. Default, Technical Assistance, and Termination
1. If the Commission determines that a Member State has defaulted in
the performance of its obligations or responsibilities under this Compact
or the promulgated Rules, the Commission shall provide written notice to
the defaulting State. The notice of default shall describe the default,
the proposed means of curing the default, and any other action that the
Commission may take, and shall offer training and specific technical
assistance regarding the default.
2. The Commission shall provide a copy of the notice of default to
the other Member States.
-26-

LB82 LB82
2025 2025
3. If a State in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting
State may be terminated from the Compact upon an affirmative vote of a
majority of the delegates of the Member States, and all rights,
privileges, and benefits conferred on that State by this Compact may be
terminated on the effective date of termination. A cure of the default
does not relieve the offending State of obligations or liabilities
incurred during the period of default.
4. Termination of membership in the Compact shall be imposed only
after all other means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice
of intent to suspend or terminate shall be given by the Commission to the
governor, the majority and minority leaders of the defaulting State's
legislature, the defaulting State's State Licensing Authority, and each
of the Member States' State Licensing Authority.
5. A State that has been terminated is responsible for all
assessments, obligations, and liabilities incurred through the effective
date of termination, including obligations that extend beyond the
effective date of termination.
6. Upon the termination of a State's membership from this Compact,
that State shall immediately provide notice to all Licensees who hold a
Multistate License within that State of such termination. The terminated
State shall continue to recognize all licenses granted pursuant to this
Compact for a minimum of one hundred eighty (180) days after the date of
said notice of termination.
7. The Commission shall not bear any costs related to a State that
is found to be in default or that has been terminated from the Compact,
unless agreed upon in writing between the Commission and the defaulting
State.
8. The defaulting State may appeal the action of the Commission by
petitioning the United States District Court for the District of Columbia
or the federal district where the Commission has its principal offices.
The prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation,
-27-

LB82 LB82
2025 2025
including reasonable attorney's fees.
C. Dispute Resolution
1. Upon request by a Member State, the Commission shall attempt to
resolve disputes related to the Compact that arise among Member States
and between Member and non-Member States.
2. The Commission shall promulgate a Rule providing for both
mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes as appropriate.
D. Enforcement
1. The Commission, in the reasonable exercise of its discretion,
shall enforce the provisions of this Compact and the Commission's Rules.
2. By majority vote as provided by Commission Rule, the Commission
may initiate legal action against a Member State in default in the United
States District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal
district where the Commission has its principal offices to enforce
compliance with the provisions of the Compact and its promulgated Rules.
The relief sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In the
event judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be
awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney's
fees. The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive remedies of the
Commission. The Commission may pursue any other remedies available under
federal or the defaulting Member State's law.
3. A Member State may initiate legal action against the Commission
in the United States District Court for the District of Columbia or the
federal district where the Commission has its principal offices to
enforce compliance with the provisions of the Compact and its promulgated
Rules. The relief sought may include both injunctive relief and damages.
In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party
shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable
attorney's fees.
4. No individual or entity other than a Member State may enforce
this Compact against the Commission.
-28-

LB82 LB82
2025 2025
ARTICLE 13- EFFECTIVE DATE, WITHDRAWAL, AND AMENDMENT
A. The Compact shall come into effect on the date on which the
Compact statute is enacted into law in the seventh Member State.
1. On or after the effective date of the Compact, the Commission
shall convene and review the enactment of each of the Charter Member
States to determine if the statute enacted by each such Charter Member
State is materially different than the model Compact statute.
a. A Charter Member State whose enactment is found to be materially
different from the model Compact statute shall be entitled to the default
process set forth in Article 12.
b. If any Member State is later found to be in default, or is
terminated or withdraws from the Compact, the Commission shall remain in
existence and the Compact shall remain in effect even if the number of
Member States should be less than seven (7).
2. Member States enacting the Compact subsequent to the Charter
Member States shall be subject to the process set forth in Article 9.C.24
to determine if their enactments are materially different from the model
Compact statute and whether they qualify for participation in the
Compact.
3. All actions taken for the benefit of the Commission or in
furtherance of the purposes of the administration of the Compact prior to
the effective date of the Compact or the Commission coming into existence
shall be considered to be actions of the Commission unless specifically
repudiated by the Commission.
4. Any State that joins the Compact shall be subject to the
Commission's Rules and bylaws as they exist on the date on which the
Compact becomes law in that State. Any Rule that has been previously
adopted by the Commission shall have the full force and effect of law on
the day the Compact becomes law in that State.
B. Any Member State may withdraw from this Compact by enacting a
statute repealing that State's enactment of the Compact.
-29-

LB82 LB82
2025 2025
1. A Member State's withdrawal shall not take effect until one
hundred eighty (180) days after enactment of the repealing statute.
2. Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement of the
withdrawing State's State Licensing Authority to comply with the
investigative and Adverse Action reporting requirements of this Compact
prior to the effective date of withdrawal.
3. Upon the enactment of a statute withdrawing from this Compact, a
State shall immediately provide notice of such withdrawal to all
Licensees within that State. Notwithstanding any subsequent statutory
enactment to the contrary, such withdrawing State shall continue to
recognize all licenses granted pursuant to this Compact for a minimum of
one hundred eighty (180) days after the date of such notice of
withdrawal.
C. Nothing contained in this Compact shall be construed to
invalidate or prevent any licensure agreement or other cooperative
arrangement between a Member State and a non-Member State that does not
conflict with the provisions of this Compact.
D. This Compact may be amended by the Member States. No amendment to
this Compact shall become effective and binding upon any Member State
until it is enacted into the laws of all Member States.
ARTICLE 14- CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY
A. This Compact and the Commission's rulemaking authority shall be
liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes, and the
implementation and administration of the Compact. Provisions of the
Compact expressly authorizing or requiring the promulgation of Rules
shall not be construed to limit the Commission's rulemaking authority
solely for those purposes.
B. The provisions of this Compact shall be severable and if any
phrase, clause, sentence, or provision of this Compact is held by a court
of competent jurisdiction to be contrary to the constitution of any
Member State, a State seeking participation in the Compact, or of the
-30-

LB82 LB82
2025 2025
United States, or the applicability thereof to any government, agency,
person, or circumstance is held to be unconstitutional by a court of
competent jurisdiction, the validity of the remainder of this Compact and
the applicability thereof to any other government, agency, person, or
circumstance shall not be affected thereby.
C. Notwithstanding Article 14.B, the Commission may deny a State's
participation in the Compact or, in accordance with the requirements of
Article 12, terminate a Member State's participation in the Compact, if
it determines that a constitutional requirement of a Member State is a
material departure from the Compact. Otherwise, if this Compact shall be
held to be contrary to the constitution of any Member State, the Compact
shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining Member States
and in full force and effect as to the Member State affected as to all
severable matters.
ARTICLE 15- CONSISTENT EFFECT AND CONFLICT WITH OTHER STATE LAWS
A. Nothing herein shall prevent or inhibit the enforcement of any
other law of a Member State that is not inconsistent with the Compact.
B. Any laws, statutes, regulations, or other legal requirements in a
Member State in conflict with the Compact are superseded to the extent of
the conflict.
C. All permissible agreements between the Commission and the Member
States are binding in accordance with their terms.
Sec. 2. Section 38-1001, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
38-1001 Sections 38-1001 to 38-10,172 and section 5 of this act
shall be known and may be cited as the Cosmetology, Electrology,
Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art Practice Act.
Sec. 3. Section 38-1004, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
38-1004 For purposes of the Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics,
Nail Technology, and Body Art Practice Act and elsewhere in the Uniform
-31-

LB82 LB82
2025 2025
Credentialing Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions
found in sections 38-1005 to 38-1056 and section 5 of this act apply.
Sec. 4. Section 38-1015, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
38-1015 Cosmetologist means a person licensed under the Cosmetology,
Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art Practice Act to
perform all of the practices of cosmetology or a person holding an
authorization to practice under the Cosmetology Licensure Compact.
Sec. 5. License or licensure, when used in reference to a
requirement that an individual be licensed to practice cosmetology,
includes:
(1) A license to practice cosmetology issued by the department under
the Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art
Practice Act; and
(2) Subject to rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under
the act, an authorization to practice under the Cosmetology Licensure
Compact.
Sec. 6. Section 38-1058, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
38-1058 It shall be unlawful for any person, group, company, or
other entity to engage in any of the following acts without being duly
licensed as required by the Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail
Technology, and Body Art Practice Act, or without holding an
authorization to practice under the Cosmetology Licensure Compact, unless
specifically excepted by such act:
(1) To engage in or follow or to advertise or hold oneself out as
engaging in or following any of the practices of cosmetology or to act as
a practitioner;
(2) To engage in or advertise or hold oneself out as engaging in the
teaching of any of the practices of cosmetology; or
(3) To operate or advertise or hold oneself out as operating a
-32-

LB82 LB82
2025 2025
cosmetology establishment in which any of the practices of cosmetology or
the teaching of any of the practices of cosmetology are carried out.
Sec. 7. Section 38-1061, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
38-1061 (1) All practitioners shall be licensed by the department
under the Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body
Art Practice Act, or hold an authorization to practice under the
Cosmetology Licensure Compact, in a category or categories appropriate to
their practice.
(2) Licensure or an authorization to practice under the Cosmetology
Licensure Compact shall be required before any person may engage in the
full, unsupervised practice or teaching of cosmetology, electrology,
esthetics, nail technology, or body art, and no person may assume the
title of cosmetologist, electrologist, esthetician, instructor, nail
technician, nail technology instructor, esthetics instructor, permanent
color technician, tattoo artist, body piercer, or body brander without
first being licensed by the department or holding a compact
authorization.
(3) All licensed and authorized practitioners shall practice in an
appropriate licensed establishment or facility.
Sec. 8. Original section 38-1015, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and sections 38-1001, 38-1004, 38-1058, and 38-1061, Revised
Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-33-